Utah statutes.
35A-3-309.   Information regarding home ownership.

(1)  The division shall provide information and service coordination to assist a client to obtain affordable housing.

(2)  The information and services may include:

(a)  information from the Utah Housing Corporation and the Housing and Community Development Division regarding special housing programs, including programs for first-time home buyers and persons with low and moderate incomes and the eligibility requirements for those programs;

(b)  referrals to programs operated by volunteers from the real estate industry that assist clients in obtaining affordable housing, including information on home ownership, down payments, closing costs, and credit requirements; and

(c)  referrals to housing programs operated by municipalities, counties, local housing authorities, and nonprofit housing organizations that assist individuals to obtain affordable housing, including first-time home ownership.



Amended by Chapter 212, 2012 General Session

